Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 4 Attendance and Leave
21-4-505. Compensation for unused sick leave of nonclassified employees of state-supported institutions of higher education — Calculation for unused sick leave.

At its discretion, a state-supported institution of higher education may compensate a nonclassified employee of the state-supported institution of higher education for accumulated unused sick leave by providing to the nonclassified employee the same compensation for accumulated unused sick leave provided to a classified employee of the state-supported institution of higher education under § 21-4-501.

Compensation for accumulated unused sick leave under this section shall not be used by the:

Arkansas Teacher Retirement System in the calculation of final average salary under § 24-7-202; or

Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System in the calculation of final average compensation under § 24-4-101.

Unused sick leave for nonclassified employees of state-supported institutions of higher education shall accrue at the same rate as unused sick leave accrues for classified employees for calculations made under this section.

Publisher's Notes. Former §21-4-505, concerning employees of two-year colleges, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 827, § 173. The former section was derived from Acts 2005, No. 971, § 1.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote the section heading; in (a), substituted “a state-supported institution” for “a two-year institution” and substituted “the state-supported institution of higher education” for “the institution” twice; and added (c).

Am. Jur. 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Pub. Off., § 271 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1991, No. 652, §§ 1-7, provided:

“SECTION 1.Notwithstanding provisions of the Uniform Leave and Attendance Act (A.C.A. §21-4-201, et seq.) any employee of a state agency or institution of higher education called to active duty as a member of the National Guard or any of the Reserve components of the armed forces for the purpose of participation in Operation Desert Shield/Desert Storm shall be eligible for continued proportionate salary payments which, when combined with the employees' active duty pay, shall equal the amount they would have otherwise received were it not for their required active duty under Operation Desert Shield/Desert Storm, until such time as they are released from active duty.

“SECTION 2.It is the intent of the General Assembly that the compensation received by any employee of the State of Arkansas called to active duty after August 2, 1990, for participation in Operation Desert Shield/Desert Storm shall not be less than the employee would have received had such employee not been called to active duty.

“SECTION 3.The Department of Finance and Administration shall establish appropriate procedures for the administration of this program.

“SECTION 4.All provisions of this Act of a general and permanent nature are amendatory to the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall incorporate the same in the Code.

“SECTION 5.Severability. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or application of the Act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are declared to be severable.

“SECTION 6.General repealer. All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are hereby repealed.

“SECTION 7.Emergency clause. It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that there is a need to provide compensation to state employees who were called to active duty during Operation Desert Shield/Desert Storm; and this Act should be given effect immediately in order to grant the various agencies and state supported institutions of higher education the power to institute this program as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2010, No. 159, § 5, provided: “SALARIES. In order that exceptionally well-qualified personnel may be recruited and retained, the Office of the Governor may exceed the maximum salary levels by no more than twenty percent (20%) for no more than one-third (1/3) of the positions authorized in the operation appropriation act after receiving approval from the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.”

Acts 2013, No. 24, § 5, provided: “SALARIES. In order that exceptionally well-qualified personnel may be recruited and retained, the Office of the Governor may exceed the maximum salary levels by no more than twenty percent (20%) for no more than one-third (1/3) of the positions authorized in the operation appropriation act after receiving approval from the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.”

Acts 2014, No. 74, § 5, provided: “SALARIES. In order that exceptionally well-qualified personnel may be recruited and retained, the Office of the Governor may exceed the maximum salary levels by no more than twenty percent (20%) for no more than one-third (1/3) of the positions authorized in the operation appropriation act after receiving approval from the Arkansas Legislative council or Joint Budget Committee.”

Acts 2016, No. 77, § 5, provided: “SALARIES. In order that exceptionally well-qualified personnel may be recruited and retained, the Office of the Governor may exceed the maximum salary levels by no more than twenty percent (20%) for no more than one-third (1/3) of the positions authorized in the operation appropriation act after receiving approval from the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1989, No. 882, § 7: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly that the awarding of annual career service recognition payments to career State employees is necessary to promote morale and retention of vital career employees in State service. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1991, No. 566, § 5: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the awarding of annual career service recognition payments to career State employees is necessary to promote morale and retention of vital career employees in State service. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1995, No. 490, § 5: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas meeting in Regular Session, that the awarding of annual career service recognition payments to career State employees is necessary to promote morale and retention of vital career employees in State service. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 2001, No. 1295, § 2: became law without Governor's signature Apr. 5, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that because of Act 51 of 1967, court reporters and case coordinators have been paid on a monthly basis, when the vast majority of all other state employees are paid on a semi-monthly or bi-weekly basis. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 386, § 2: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this act change the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act and should become effective July 1, 2007, for consistent application and to avoid confusion and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, No. 799, § 4: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the consideration of retirement benefits in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and that the ideal and most efficient time to make revisions to the consideration of retirement benefits is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 688, § 15: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year for employees begins on July 1 of every year and that the implementation of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act is immediately necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2017, No. 365, § 29: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year for employees begins on July 1 of every year and that the implementation of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act is necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

For any position authorized by the General Assembly for the benefit of any department, agency, board, commission, institution, or program for which the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., are to be applicable, it is declared to be the intent of the General Assembly that the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., shall govern with respect to:

The entrance pay level;

The procedures by which salary increases may be granted; and

The maximum pay level that may be paid for the grade assigned each employee under the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq.;

For any position authorized by the General Assembly for the benefit of any department, agency, board, commission, institution, or program for which a maximum pay level is set out in dollars, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the position is to be paid at a rate of pay not to exceed the maximum established for the position during any one (1) fiscal year and that the maximum pay level authorized is for full-time employment;

For all positions authorized by the General Assembly for any department, agency, board, commission, institution, or program, it is the intent of the General Assembly that in determining the annual salaries of these employees, the administrative head of the department, agency, board, commission, institution, or program shall take into consideration ability of the employee and length of service.

It is not the intent of the General Assembly that the maximum pay level as authorized in the appropriation act, or any increases established for the various grades under the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., be paid unless the qualifications are complied with and then only within the limitations of the appropriations and funds available for this purpose.

An employee authorized by the General Assembly shall not receive from appropriated or cash funds, either from state, federal, or other sources, compensation in an amount greater than that established by the General Assembly as the maximum pay level for the employee unless specific provisions are made therefor by law; and

An employee of the State of Arkansas shall not be paid any additional cash allowances, including without limitation uniform allowance, clothing allowance, motor vehicle depreciation or replacement allowance, fixed transportation allowance, and meals and lodging allowance, other than for reimbursement for costs actually incurred by the employee unless the allowances are specifically set out by law as to eligibility of employees to receive the allowances, and the maximum amount of the allowances is established by law for each employee or for each class of employees eligible to receive the allowances.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The quotation in this section of Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 4, predates the amendment of Article 16, § 4, by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94. As amended, Article 16, § 4, reads as follows: “Salaries and fees of state officers. Except as provided in Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 31, the General Assembly shall fix the salaries and fees of all officers in the State; and no greater salary or fee than that fixed by law shall be paid to any officer, employee, or other person, or at any rate other than par value; and the number and salaries of the clerks and employees of the different departments of the State shall be fixed by law.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (b), deleted “step” at the end of (b)(1)(A), substituted “salary” for “step” in (b)(1)(B), and inserted “and that the maximum annual salary authorized is for full-time employment” in (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment inserted “and §19-4-1601” in (a); substituted “Except as provided in Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 31, the” for “The” in the introductory language of (b); deleted “of the State of Arkansas” following “Assembly” in the introductory language of (b)(1); substituted “pay level” for “salary” in (b)(1)(A); substituted “procedures by” for “frequency with” in (b)(1)(B); substituted “pay level” for “annual salary” in (b)(1)(C), twice in (b)(2), and in (b)(3)(C); in (b)(3)(B), substituted “pay level” for “annual salaries”, “any increases” for “step increases”, and “the qualifications are complied with” for “the employee possesses such qualifications”; substituted “and meals” for “or meals” in (b)(4); and made stylistic changes.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

Cross References. Salary procedures and restrictions, §19-4-1601.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 220, §
2; 2011, No. 337, §
1.

Subchapter 3

— Military Leave of Absence

21-4-306. Circuit court judges.

21-4-503. Applicability of subchapter.